Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.030

Applicability.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this chapter applies to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document and an electronic signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document.

(2) This chapter does not apply to a nontestamentary estate planning document if the document precludes use of an electronic record or electronic signature.

(3) This chapter does not affect the validity of an electronic record or electronic signature that is valid under:

(a) Chapter 1.80 RCW;

(b) Chapter 5.50 RCW;

(c) RCW 11.12.400 through 11.12.491; or

(d) Chapter 42.45 RCW.

[ 2024 c 188 s 4.]